Florida, session 2026, SB458.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (5) of section 12 125.0104, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 13 125.0104âTourist development tax; procedure for levying; 14 authorized uses; referendum; enforcement.â 15 (5)âAUTHORIZED USES OF REVENUE.â 16 (a)âAll tax revenues received pursuant to this section by a 17 county imposing the tourist development tax shall be used by 18 that county for the following purposes only: 19 1.âTo acquire, construct, extend, enlarge, remodel, repair, 20 improve, maintain, operate, or promote one or more: 21 a.âPublicly owned and operated convention centers, sports 22 stadiums, sports arenas, coliseums, or auditoriums within the 23 boundaries of the county or subcounty special taxing district in 24 which the tax is levied; 25 b.âAuditoriums that are publicly owned but are operated by 26 organizations that are exempt from federal taxation pursuant to 27 26 U.S.C. s. 501(c)(3) and open to the public, within the 28 boundaries of the county or subcounty special taxing district in 29 which the tax is levied; or 30 c.âAquariums or museums that are publicly owned and 31 operated or owned and operated by not-for-profit organizations 32 and open to the public, within the boundaries of the county or 33 subcounty special taxing district in which the tax is levied; 34 2.âTo promote zoological parks that are publicly owned and 35 operated or owned and operated by not-for-profit organizations 36 and open to the public; 37 3.âTo promote and advertise tourism in this state and 38 nationally and internationally; however, if tax revenues are 39 expended for an activity, service, venue, or event, the 40 activity, service, venue, or event must have as one of its main 41 purposes the attraction of tourists as evidenced by the 42 promotion of the activity, service, venue, or event to tourists; 43 4.âTo fund convention bureaus, tourist bureaus, tourist 44 information centers, and news bureaus as county agencies or by 45 contract with the chambers of commerce or similar associations 46 in the county, which may include any indirect administrative 47 costs for services performed by the county on behalf of the 48 promotion agency; 49 5.âTo finance beach park facilities, or beach, channel, 50 estuary, or lagoon improvement, maintenance, renourishment, 51 restoration, and erosion control, including construction of 52 beach groins and shoreline protection, enhancement, cleanup, or 53 restoration of inland lakes and rivers to which there is public 54 access as those uses relate to the physical preservation of the 55 beach, shoreline, channel, estuary, lagoon, or inland lake or 56 river. However, any funds identified by a county as the local 57 matching source for beach renourishment, restoration, or erosion 58 control projects included in the long-range budget plan of the 59 stateâs Beach Management Plan, pursuant to s. 161.091, or funds 60 contractually obligated by a county in the financial plan for a 61 federally authorized shore protection project may not be used or 62 loaned for any other purpose. In counties of fewer than 100,000 63 population, up to 10 percent of the revenues from the tourist 64 development tax may be used for beach park facilities; 65 6.âTo acquire, construct, extend, enlarge, remodel, repair, 66 improve, maintain, operate, or finance public facilities within 67 the boundaries of the county or subcounty special taxing 68 district in which the tax is levied, if the public facilities 69 are needed to increase tourist-related business activities in 70 the county or subcounty special district and are recommended by 71 the county tourist development council created pursuant to 72 paragraph (4)(e). Tax revenues may be used for any related land 73 acquisition, land improvement, design and engineering costs, and 74 all other professional and related costs required to bring the 75 public facilities into service. As used in this subparagraph, 76 the term âpublic facilitiesâ means major capital improvements 77 that have a life expectancy of 5 or more years, including, but 78 not limited to, transportation, sanitary sewer, solid waste, 79 drainage, potable water, and pedestrian facilities. Tax revenues 80 may be used for these purposes only if the following conditions 81 are satisfied: 82 a.âIn the county fiscal year immediately preceding the 83 fiscal year in which the tax revenues were initially used for 84 such purposes, at least $10 million in tourist development tax 85 revenue was received or the county is a fiscally constrained 86 county, as described in s. 218.67(1), located adjacent to the 87 Gulf of America or the Atlantic Ocean; 88 b.âThe county governing board approves the use for the 89 proposed public facilities by a vote of at least two-thirds of 90 its membership; 91 c.âNo more than 70 percent of the cost of the proposed 92 public facilities will be paid for with tourist development tax 93 revenues, and sources of funding for the remaining cost are 94 identified and confirmed by the county governing board; 95 d.âAt least 20 40 percent of all tourist development tax 96 revenues collected in the county are spent to promote and 97 advertise tourism as provided by this subsection; and 98 e.âAn independent professional analysis, performed at the 99 expense of the county tourist development council, demonstrates 100 the positive impact of the infrastructure project on tourist 101 related businesses in the county; or 102 7.âTo employ, train, equip, insure, or otherwise fund the 103 provision of lifeguards certified by the American Red Cross, the 104 Y.M.C.A., or an equivalent nationally recognized aquatic 105 training program, for beaches on the Gulf of America or the 106 Atlantic Ocean. 107 108 Subparagraphs 1. and 2. may be implemented through service 109 contracts and leases with lessees that have sufficient expertise 110 or financial capability to operate such facilities. 111 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.